Illinois, session 104th, HB416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 175/1)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1651)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Narcotics Profit Forfeiture Act.9(Source: P.A. 82-940.)